Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-305
Rules and regulations; camping areas; violation; penalty.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to designate camping areas and permit camping on appropriate lands under its ownership or control. As a condition to such permission, the commission may prescribe such rules and regulations as are reasonable and proper governing public use of such camping areas, including, but not limited to, access to camping areas, area capacity, sanitation, opening and closing hours, public safety, fires, establishment and collection of fees when appropriate, protection of property, and zoning of activities. Such rules and regulations shall be posted on appropriate signs at the areas. Any person who camps on lands owned or controlled by the commission not designated as a camping area by the commission or any person who fails to observe the conditions of occupancy, use, or access posted as provided in this section shall not have permission. Any person violating the provisions of the rules and regulations authorized by this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 63.